Florida, session 2026, SB1536.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âParagraph (f) of subsection (1) of section 11 810.145, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 12 810.145âDigital voyeurism.â 13 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 14 (f)ââReasonable expectation of privacyâ means circumstances 15 under which a reasonable person would believe that he or she 16 could fully disrobe in privacy, without being concerned that the 17 personâs undressing was being viewed, recorded, or broadcasted 18 by another, including, but not limited to, the interior of a 19 residential dwelling, privately fenced yard, bathroom, changing 20 room, fitting room, dressing room, or tanning booth. 21 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.